fi: Pohjan täyttömateriaali: Betoni; Ei täytettä; Esipainotettu jalusta; Hiekka; Vesi; Muu
vi: Vật liệu lấp đầy đế: Bê tông; Không nhồi; Đế có sẵn trọng lượng; Cát; Nước; Khác
es: Material de relleno de la base: Concreto; Sin relleno; Base prepesada; Arena; Agua; Otro
it: Materiale di riempimento di base: Cemento; Nessun riempimento; Base pre-zavorrata; Sabbia; Acqua; Altro
pt-PT: Material de enchimento da base: Betão; Sem enchimento; Base pré-pesada; Areia; Água; Outro
en: Base fill material: Concrete; No fill; Pre-weighted base; Sand; Water; Other
tr: Taban dolgu malzemesi: Beton; Dolgusuz; Önceden ağırlıklı taban; Kum; Su; Diğer
zh-TW: 底座填充材質: 混凝土; 無填充物; 預先加重底座; 沙子; 水; 其他
ja: 土台充填材: コンクリート; 充填なし; 充填済みベース; 砂; 水; その他
sl-SI: Polnilni material podstavka: Beton; Brez polnila; Vnaprej obtežen podstavek; Pesek; Voda; Drugo
pl: Materiał wypełnienia podstawy: Beton; Brak wypełnienia; Fabrycznie obciążona podstawa; Piasek; Woda; Inne
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ถ่วงน้ำหนักภายในฐาน: คอนกรีต; ไม่เติม; ฐานถ่วงน้ำหนัก; ทราย; น้ำ; อื่นๆ
nb: Basisfyllingsmateriale: Betong; Ingen fyll; Forhåndsvektet base; Sand; Vann; Annet
ru: Материал наполнителя основания: Бетон; Без наполнителя; Основание с утяжелителем; Песок; Вода; Другое
bg-BG: Материал за запълване на основата: Бетон; Без пълнеж; Предварително утежнена основа; Пясък; Вода; Друго
da: Fyldmateriale i base: Beton; Intet fyld; Forudvægtet fod; Sand; Vand; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal ispune baze: Beton; Bez punjenja; Postolje s utegom; Pijesak; Voda; Ostalo
ro-RO: Material de umplere a bazei: Beton; Fără umplutură; Bază lestată în prealabil; Nisip; Apă; Altele
ko: 받침대 충전 재질: 콘크리트; 충전재 없음; 웨이트 내장 받침대; 모래; 물; 기타
lt-LT: Pagrindo užpildo medžiaga: Betonas; Be užpildo; Iš anksto pasunkintas pagrindas; Smėlis; Vanduo; Kita
nl: Basis vulmateriaal: Beton; Geen vulling; Voorverzwaarde voet; Zand; Water; Overig
sk-SK: Výplňový materiál základne: Betón; Bez výplne; Vopred zaťažená základňa; Piesok; Voda; Iné
hu: Alap töltőanyag: Beton; Nincs töltőanyag; Előre súlyozott talp; Homok; Víz; Egyéb
sv: Basfyllningsmaterial: Betong; Ingen fyllning; Förtyngd fot; Sand; Vatten; Övrigt
pt-BR: Material de enchimento da base: Concreto; Sem enchimento; Base pré-pesada; Areia; Água; Outros
fr: Matériau de remplissage de la base: Béton; Sans remplissage; Base prélestée; Sable; Eau; Autre
cs: Základní výplňový materiál: Beton; Bez výplně; Předem zatížená základna; Písek; Voda; Jiné
zh-CN: 基底填充材质: 混凝土; 无填充; 预配重底座; 沙子; 水; 其他
de: Sockelfüllmaterial: Beton; Keine Füllung; Vorbeschwerter Standfuß; Sand; Wasser; Sonstige
el: Υλικό πλήρωσης βάσης: Σκυρόδεμα; Χωρίς γέμισμα; Βάση με προεγκατεστημένο βάρος; Άμμος; Νερό; Άλλο